Utah statutes.
11-44-301 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Selection.

(1)  A political subdivision shall follow the procedures outlined in Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, when selecting a qualified energy service provider.

(2)  The Division of Purchasing shall maintain a list of qualified energy service providers.

(3)  The qualified energy service provider selected from the bid process shall prepare an investment grade energy audit, which shall become part of the final contract between the political subdivision and the qualified energy service provider.

(4)  The audit shall include:

(a)  a detailed description of the energy efficiency measure;

(b)  an estimated cost; and

(c)  a projected cost savings.

